Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
RESTRAINT AND INVOLUNTARY SECLUSION
SECTION 1. Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Certified foster home” means a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645.
(2) “Chemical restraint” means a drug or medication that is administered to a  child in
care to control behavior or restrict freedom of movement.
(3) “Child-caring agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.205.
(4) “Child in care” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.257.
(5) “Children’s  emergency safety intervention specialist” means a qualified mental health
professional licensed to order, monitor and evaluate the use of seclusion and  restraint in
accredited and certified facilities that provide intensive mental health  treatment services to
individuals under 21 years of age.
(6) “Developmental  disabilities residential facility” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 418.257.
(7)(a) “Involuntary seclusion” means the  confinement of a child in care alone in a room
from which the child in care is prevented from leaving by any means.
(b) “Involuntary  seclusion” does not include age-appropriate discipline, including, but not
limited to, time-out if the time-out is in a setting from which the child in care is not  pre-
vented from leaving.
(8) “Mechanical restraint” means a  device used to restrict the movement of a child in
care or the movement or normal function of a portion of the body of a child in care.
(9) “Proctor foster home” means a foster home certified by a  child-caring agency under
ORS 418.248.
(10) “Program” means:
(a) A child-caring agency;
(b) A proctor foster home; or
(c) A developmental disabilities  residential facility that is a residential training home or
facility licensed under ORS 443.415 to serve children under 18 years of age.
(11) “Prone restraint” means a restraint in which a child in  care is held face down on the
floor.
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 1
(12) “Reportable injury” means any type of injury to a child in care,  including but not
limited to rug burns, fractures, sprains, bruising, pain, soft tissue injury,  punctures,
scratches, concussions, abrasions, dizziness, loss of consciousness, loss  of vision, visual dis-
turbance or death.
(13) “Restraint” means the  physical restriction of a child in care’s actions or movements
by holding the child in care or using pressure or other means.
(14) “Secure adolescent inpatient  treatment program” means a child-caring agency that
is an intensive treatment services program, as described by the  Oregon Health Authority by
rule, that  provides inpatient psychiatric stabilization and treatment services to individuals
under 21 years of age who require a secure intensive treatment setting.
(15) “Secure children’s inpatient treatment  program” means a child-caring agency that
is an intensive treatment services program, as described by the  authority by rule, that pro-
vides inpatient psychiatric stabilization and treatment services  to children under 14 years
of age who require a secure intensive treatment setting.
(16) “Serious bodily injury” means any significant impairment of  the physical condition
of an individual, as determined by qualified medical  personnel, whether self-inflicted or in-
flicted by someone else.
(17) “Supine restraint” means a restraint in which a child in  care is held face up on the
floor.
SECTION 2. Prohibitions on restraint or involuntary seclusion.  (1) A child-caring  agency,
proctor foster home, certified foster  home or developmental disabilities residential facility
may not place a child in care in a restraint or involuntary  seclusion as a form of discipline,
punishment or  retaliation or for the convenience of staff, contractors or volunteers of the
child-caring agency, proctor foster home, certified  foster home or developmental disabilities
residential facility.
(2) Except as provided in section 3 (4) of this 2021 Act, the use  of the following types of
restraint of a child in care are prohibited:
(a) Chemical restraint.
(b) Mechanical restraint.
(c) Prone restraint.
(d) Supine restraint.
(e) Any  restraint that includes the nonincidental use of a solid object, including the
ground, a wall or the floor, to impede a child in care’s movement.
(f) Any restraint that places, or creates a risk of placing, pressure on  a child in care’s
neck or throat.
(g) Any restraint that places, or creates a risk of placing,  pressure on a child in care’s
mouth.
(h) Any  restraint that impedes, or creates a risk of impeding, a child in care’s breathing.
(i) Any restraint that involves the intentional placement of hands,  feet, elbows, knees or
any object on a child in care’s neck, throat, genitals or other intimate parts.
(j) Any restraint that causes pressure to  be placed, or creates a risk of causing pressure
to be placed, on  a child in care’s stomach, chest, joints, throat or back by a knee, foot or
elbow.
(k) Any other restraint, the primary purpose of which is to inflict pain.
SECTION 3.
Permissible use of restraint or  involuntary seclusion.  (1) Except as other-
wise provided in this section, a child-caring agency, proctor foster home  or developmental
disabilities residential facility may only place a child in care  in a restraint or involuntary
seclusion if the child in care’s behavior poses a reasonable risk of imminent serious  bodily
injury to the child in care or others and less restrictive interventions  would not effectively
reduce that risk.
(2) A certified foster home may not place a child in care  in a restraint or involuntary
seclusion.
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 2
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or  (2) of this section, a child-caring agency, proctor
foster home, certified foster home or developmental disabilities residential  facility may use
the following types of restraints on a child in care:
(a) Holding the child in care’s hand or arm  to escort the child in care safely and without
the use of force from one area to another;
(b) Assisting the child in care to complete a  task if the child in care does not resist the
physical contact; or
(c) Using a physical intervention if:
(A) The intervention is necessary to break up a physical fight or to  effectively protect a
person from an assault, serious bodily injury or sexual contact;
(B) The intervention uses the least amount of physical force and contact possible; and
(C) The intervention is not a prohibited restraint described in section 2 (2) of this 2021
Act.
(4) Notwithstanding section 2 (2) of this 2021 Act:
(a) The restraint described in section 2 (2)(e) of  this 2021 Act may be used if the restraint
is necessary to gain control of a weapon.
(b) The restraint described in section 2 (2)(g)  of this 2021 Act may be used if the restraint
is necessary for the purpose of extracting a body part from a bite.
(c) If a program is a secure  children’s inpatient treatment program or secure adolescent
inpatient treatment program, the program may place a child  in care in a restraint described
in section 2 (2)(d) or (e) of this 2021 Act only if:
(A) The child in care is currently admitted to the program;
(B) The restraint is authorized by an order written at the time of and specifically for the
current situation by a licensed  medical practitioner or a licensed children’s emergency safety
intervention specialist;
(C) The  restraint is used only as long as needed to prevent serious physical injury, as
defined in ORS 161.015, and while no other intervention or form of restraint is possible;
(D) A licensed medical practitioner, children’s emergency safety intervention  specialist
or qualified mental health professional, who is certified in  the use of the type of restraint
used, continuously monitors the  use of the restraint and the physical and psychological
well-being of the child in care at all times while the restraint is being used;
(E) Each individual placing the child in care in  the restraint is trained, as required by
the Department of Human Services  by rule, in the use of the type of restraint used and the
individual’s training is current;
(F) One or more individuals with current cardiopulmonary resuscitation training  are
present for the duration of the restraint;
(G) The program has written policies  that require a licensed children’s emergency safety
intervention specialist or  other licensed practitioner to evaluate and document the physical,
psychological and emotional well-being of the child in care immediately following the use of
the restraint; and
(H) The  program is in compliance with any other requirements under sections 1 to 11 of
this 2021 Act, and the  use of the restraint does not otherwise violate any applicable contract
requirements or any state or federal law related to the use of restraints.
(5) In addition to the restraints described  in subsection (3) of this section, a program
may place a child in care in a restraint or involuntary seclusion if:
(a) The restraint or involuntary seclusion is used only for as long as the child in care’s
behavior poses a reasonable risk of imminent serious bodily injury;
(b) The individuals placing the child in care in  the restraint are trained, as required by
the department by rule, in the use of the type of restraint or involuntary seclusion used;
(c) The program staff continuously monitor the child in care for  the duration of the re-
straint or involuntary seclusion; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 3
(d) The restraint or involuntary  seclusion is performed in a manner that is safe,
proportionate and appropriate, taking into consideration the  child in care’s chronological and
developmental age, size, gender identity, physical, medical and  psychiatric condition and
personal history, including any history of physical or sexual abuse.
(6) In  addition to the requirements described in subsection (5) of this section, if a pro-
gram places a child in care in a restraint or involuntary seclusion for more than 10 minutes:
(a) The program must provide  the child in care with adequate access to the bathroom
and water at least every 30 minutes; and
(b)(A) Every five minutes  after the first 10 minutes of the restraint or involuntary se-
clusion, a program supervisor who is trained,  as required by the department by rule, in the
use of the type of restraint or involuntary seclusion  being used must provide written au-
thorization for the continuation of the restraint or involuntary seclusion.
(B) If the supervisor is not on-site at the time the restraint is used, the supervisor  may
provide the written authorization electronically.
(C) The written authorization must document  why the restraint or involuntary seclusion
continues to be the least restrictive intervention to reduce the risk  of imminent serious
bodily injury in the given circumstances.
SECTION 4.  Section 3 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) Except as otherwise provided in this  section, a child-caring agency, proctor foster
home or developmental disabilities residential facility may only place  a child in care in a restraint
or involuntary seclusion if the child in care’s behavior poses a  reasonable risk of imminent serious
bodily injury to the  child in care or others and less restrictive interventions would not effectively
reduce that risk.
(2) A certified  foster home may not place a child in care in a restraint or involuntary seclusion.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section, a child-caring agency, proctor foster
home, certified foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility may  use the following
types of restraints on a child in care:
(a) Holding the child in care’s hand or arm  to escort the child in care safely and without the
use of force from one area to another;
(b) Assisting the child in care to complete a task if the child  in care does not resist the physical
contact; or
(c) Using a physical intervention if:
(A) The intervention is necessary to break up a  physical fight or to effectively protect a person
from an assault, serious bodily injury or sexual contact;
(B) The intervention uses the least amount of physical force and contact possible; and
(C) The intervention is not a prohibited restraint described in section 2 (2) of this 2021 Act.
(4) Notwithstanding section 2 (2) of this 2021 Act:
(a) The restraint described  in section 2 (2)(e) of this 2021 Act may be used if the restraint is
necessary to gain control of a weapon.
(b) The restraint described in section 2 (2)(g) of this 2021 Act may be used if the  restraint is
necessary for the purpose of extracting a body part from a bite.
(c) If a program is a secure children’s inpatient treatment program  or secure adolescent inpa-
tient treatment program, the program may  place a child in care in a restraint described in section
2 (2)(d) or (e) of this 2021 Act only if:
(A) The child in care is currently admitted to the program;
(B) The restraint is  authorized by an order written at the time of and specifically for the current
situation by a licensed medical practitioner or  a licensed children’s emergency safety intervention
specialist;
(C) The restraint is used only as long as needed to prevent  serious physical injury, as defined
in ORS 161.015, and while no other intervention or form of restraint is possible;
(D) A licensed  medical practitioner, children’s emergency safety intervention specialist or qual-
ified mental health professional, who is certified in the use of the type of restraint  used, contin-
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 4
uously monitors the use of the restraint and the physical and psychological well-being of the  child
in care at all times while the restraint is being used;
(E) Each individual placing the child in care in the restraint  is [ trained, as required by the De-
partment of Human Services by rule, ] certified as described in section 9 of this 2021 Act  in the
use of the type of restraint used and the individual’s training is current;
(F) One  or more individuals with current cardiopulmonary resuscitation training are present for
the duration of the restraint;
(G) The program has written policies that require  a licensed children’s emergency safety inter-
vention specialist or other licensed practitioner to evaluate and document the  physical, psycholog-
ical and emotional well-being of the child in care immediately following the use of  the restraint; and
(H) The program is  in compliance with any other requirements under sections 1 to 11 of this
2021 Act,  and the use of the restraint does not otherwise violate any applicable contract require-
ments or any state or federal law related to the use of restraints.
(5) In addition to the restraints described in subsection (3)  of this section, a program may place
a child in care in a restraint or involuntary seclusion if:
(a) The restraint or involuntary seclusion is used only for  as long as the child in care’s behavior
poses a reasonable risk of imminent serious bodily injury;
(b) The individuals placing the child in  care in the restraint or involuntary seclusion are
certified as described in section 9 of this 2021 Act in the use of  the type of restraint used
or are trained, as required by the department by rule, in the use of  the [ type of restraint or ] invol-
untary seclusion used;
(c) The program staff continuously monitor the child in care for the duration  of the restraint
or involuntary seclusion; and
(d) The restraint or  involuntary seclusion is performed in a manner that is safe, proportionate
and appropriate, taking into consideration the child in  care’s chronological and developmental age,
size, gender identity, physical, medical and psychiatric condition and personal history,  including any
history of physical or sexual abuse.
(6) In addition to the requirements described in subsection (5) of this section, if a program places
a child in care in a restraint or involuntary seclusion for more than 10 minutes:
(a) The program must provide the child in care with adequate access  to the bathroom and water
at least every 30 minutes; and
(b)(A) Every five minutes after the first 10 minutes of the restraint or involuntary seclusion,  a
program supervisor who is  certified as described in section 9 of this 2021 Act  in the use of the
type of restraint being  used or  trained, as required by the department by rule, in the use of the
[type of restraint or ] involuntary seclusion being used must provide  written authorization for the
continuation of the restraint or involuntary seclusion.
(B) If the supervisor is not on-site at the time the restraint is used, the supervisor may  provide
the written authorization electronically.
(C) The  written authorization must document why the restraint or involuntary seclusion con-
tinues to be the least restrictive intervention to reduce  the risk of imminent serious bodily injury
in the given circumstances.
SECTION 5. Procedures, notices and reports.  (1) A program shall establish procedures
for the program to follow when a child in  care is placed in a restraint or involuntary seclu-
sion. The procedures must be consistent with the provisions of this  section and sections 2
and 3 of this 2021 Act.
(2) A program shall maintain  a record of each incident in which a reportable injury arises
from the use of a restraint or involuntary seclusion. The record under this subsection must
include any audio or video recording immediately preceding, during and following  the inci-
dent.
(3)(a) If a program places a child in care in a restraint except as provided in  section 3
(3)(a) or (b) of this 2021 Act, or involuntary seclusion,  the program shall provide the child in
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 5
care’s case manager, attorney, court appointed special  advocate and parents or guardians
with:
(A) Verbal or electronic  notice that the restraint or involuntary seclusion was used as
soon as practicable following the incident but not later than the end of the next business day;
and
(B) Written notice that the restraint or involuntary seclusion was used as  soon as
practicable following the incident but not later than the end of the next business day.
(b) The written notice must include:
(A) A description of the restraint or involuntary seclusion, the  date of the restraint or
involuntary seclusion, the  times when the restraint or involuntary seclusion began and ended
and the location of the restraint or involuntary seclusion.
(B) A description of the child in  care’s activity that necessitated the use of restraint or
involuntary seclusion.
(C) The efforts  the program used to de-escalate the situation and the alternatives to re-
straint or involuntary seclusion the program  attempted before placing the child in care in
the restraint or involuntary seclusion.
(D)(i) The names of each of individual who placed the child in  care in the restraint or
involuntary seclusion or who monitored or approved the placement  of the child in care in the
restraint or involuntary seclusion.
(ii) For each individual identified in this subparagraph, whether the  individual was
trained, as required by the Department of Human Services by  rule, in the use of the type
of restraint or involuntary seclusion used, the date of the individual’s  most recent training
and a description of the types of restraint the individual is trained to use, if any.
(iii) If an individual identified in this subparagraph was not trained in the  type of re-
straint or involuntary seclusion used, or if the individual’s training was not  current, a de-
scription of the individual’s training deficiency and the reason an  individual without the
proper training was involved in the restraint or involuntary seclusion.
(4) If an incident requires notice under subsection (3) of this section, not  later than two
business days following the date of the restraint or involuntary seclusion,  the program shall
hold a debriefing meeting with each individual who was involved in the incident and with any
other appropriate program staff, shall  take written notes of the debriefing meeting and shall
provide copies of the written notes to the child in care’s case manager, attorney, court ap-
pointed special advocate and parents or guardians.
(5)(a) If a program places a child in care  in a restraint or involuntary seclusion and the
child in care suffers a reportable injury arising from  the restraint or involuntary seclusion,
the program shall immediately provide the department and the child in care’s attorney, court
appointed special advocate and parents or guardians with written notification of the incident
and access to and, upon request, copies of all  records related to the restraint or involuntary
seclusion, including any photographs and audio or video recordings.
(b) If serious  bodily injury or the death of staff personnel occurs in connection to the
use of the  restraint or involuntary seclusion, the program shall provide the department with
written notification of the incident not later than 24 hours following the incident.
SECTION 6.
 Section 5 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 5. (1) A program shall establish procedures for  the program to follow when a child in care
is placed in a restraint or involuntary seclusion. The procedures must be  consistent with the pro-
visions of this section and sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act.
(2) A program shall maintain a record of each incident  in which a reportable injury arises from
the use of a restraint or involuntary seclusion. The record under this subsection must include any
audio or video recording immediately preceding, during and following the incident.
(3)(a) If a program places a child in care in a restraint except as provided in section  3 (3)(a) or
(b) of this 2021 Act,  or involuntary seclusion, the program shall provide the child in care’s case
manager, attorney, court appointed special advocate and parents or guardians with:
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 6
(A) Verbal or electronic notice that the restraint or involuntary seclusion  was used as soon as
practicable following the incident but not later than the end of the next business day; and
(B) Written notice that the restraint or  involuntary seclusion was used as soon as practicable
following the incident but not later than the end of the next business day.
(b) The written notice must include:
(A) A description of the restraint or involuntary seclusion, the date of the restraint or involun-
tary seclusion, the times when the  restraint or involuntary seclusion began and ended and the lo-
cation of the restraint or involuntary seclusion.
(B) A description of the  child in care’s activity that necessitated the use of restraint or invol-
untary seclusion.
(C) The efforts  the program used to de-escalate the situation and the alternatives to restraint
or involuntary seclusion the program attempted before  placing the child in care in the restraint or
involuntary seclusion.
(D)(i) The names of each of individual who placed the child in  care in the restraint or involun-
tary seclusion or who monitored or approved  the placement of the child in care in the restraint or
involuntary seclusion.
(ii) For each individual identified in this subparagraph, whether the individual  was certified as
described in section 9  of this 2021 Act in the use of the type of restraint used or  trained, as
required by the Department of Human Services by rule, in the use of the [ type of restraint or ] in-
voluntary seclusion used, the date of the individual’s most recent certification or  training and a
description of the types of restraint the individual is [ trained] certified to use, if any.
(iii) If an individual identified in this subparagraph was not certified or trained in the type of
restraint or involuntary seclusion used, or if the individual’s certification or training was not  cur-
rent, a description of  the individual’s certification or  training deficiency and the reason an indi-
vidual without the proper certification or  training was involved in the restraint or involuntary
seclusion.
(4) If an incident requires notice under subsection  (3) of this section, not later than two business
days following the date of the restraint or involuntary  seclusion, the program shall hold a debriefing
meeting with each individual who was involved in the incident and with any  other appropriate
program staff, shall take written notes of the  debriefing meeting and shall provide copies of the
written notes to  the child in care’s case manager, attorney, court appointed special advocate and
parents or guardians.
(5)(a) If a program places a child in care in a restraint  or involuntary seclusion and the child
in care suffers a reportable injury arising from the restraint or  involuntary seclusion, the program
shall immediately provide the department and the child in care’s  attorney, court appointed special
advocate and parents or guardians with written  notification of the incident and access to and, upon
request, copies  of all records related to the restraint or involuntary seclusion, including any photo-
graphs and audio or video recordings.
(b) If serious  bodily injury or the death of staff personnel occurs in connection to the use of the
restraint or involuntary seclusion, the program shall provide the department with  written notifica-
tion of the incident not later than 24 hours following the incident.
SECTION 7.
Reporting requirements.  (1) A program must prepare and submit to the
Department of Human Services a quarterly report detailing the program’s use  of restraint
and involuntary seclusion for the preceding three-month period, including, at a minimum:
(a) The total number of incidents involving restraint.
(b) The total number of incidents involving involuntary seclusion.
(c) The total number of involuntary seclusions in a locked room.
(d) The total number of rooms available for use by the program for  involuntary seclusion
and a description of the dimensions and design of the rooms.
(e) The total number of children in care placed in restraint.
(f) The total number of children in care placed in involuntary seclusion.
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 7
(g) The total number of incidents  under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection that re-
sulted in reportable injuries.
(h) The number of children  in care who were placed in restraint or involuntary seclusion
more than three times during the preceding  three-month period and a description of the
steps the program has taken to decrease the use of restraint and involuntary seclusion.
(i) The number of incidents in which an individual who placed a child in  care in a re-
straint or involuntary seclusion was not trained, as  required by the department by rule, in
the use of the type of restraint or involuntary seclusion used.
(j) The demographic characteristics of the children in  care who the program placed in a
restraint or involuntary seclusion, including race, ethnicity,  gender, disability status,
migrant status, English proficiency and status as economically disadvantaged,  unless the
demographic information would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual
child in care.
(2)(a) If a program provides services in more than one  location, the reports under sub-
section (1) of this section must separate the data for each location that serves  five or more
children in care.
(b) If the site-specific data  for a given location is not provided under paragraph (a) of this
subsection because the program serves fewer than five children in care at  that location, the
program’s report must include a notation  indicating the aggregate number of children in
care served by the program across all of the program’s  locations and the reporting require-
ments under paragraph (a) of  this subsection continue to apply to any of the program’s other
locations serving five or more children in care.
(3)(a) The department shall make each quarterly report it receives under this section
available to the public on the department’s website.
(b) Each program that submits a report under  this section shall make its quarterly re-
port available to the public upon request at the program’s main office and on the  program’s
website if the program maintains a website.
(c) Each program shall provide notice regarding  how to access the quarterly reports to
the parents or guardians  of children in care in the program. The program shall provide the
notice upon the child in care’s admission and at least two times each year thereafter.
SECTION 8.  Section 7 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  (1) A program must prepare and submit  to the Department of Human Services a quar-
terly report detailing the program’s use of restraint and involuntary seclusion for the preceding
three-month period, including, at a minimum:
(a) The total number of incidents involving restraint.
(b) The total number of incidents involving involuntary seclusion.
(c) The total number of involuntary seclusions in a locked room.
(d) The total number of rooms available for use by the program for  involuntary seclusion and
a description of the dimensions and design of the rooms.
(e) The total number of children in care placed in restraint.
(f) The total number of children in care placed in involuntary seclusion.
(g) The total number of  incidents under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection that resulted in
reportable  injuries.
(h) The number of children in  care who were placed in restraint or involuntary seclusion more
than three times during the preceding three-month period  and a description of the steps the program
has taken to decrease the use of restraint and involuntary seclusion.
(i) The number of incidents in which an individual who placed a  child in care in a restraint or
involuntary seclusion was not  certified as described in section 9 of this  2021 Act or  trained, as
required by the department by rule, in the use of the  type of restraint or involuntary seclusion used.
(j) The demographic characteristics of the children  in care who the program placed in a re-
straint or involuntary seclusion,  including race, ethnicity, gender, disability status, migrant status,
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 8
English proficiency and  status as economically disadvantaged, unless the demographic information
would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual child in care.
(2)(a) If a program provides services  in more than one location, the reports under subsection (1)
of this section must separate the data for each location that serves five or more children in care.
(b) If the site-specific data for a  given location is not provided under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section because the program serves fewer than five children in care at that location, the  program’s
report  must include a notation indicating the aggregate number of children in care served by the
program across all of the program’s locations and the reporting  requirements under paragraph (a)
of this subsection continue to apply to any of the  program’s other locations serving five or more
children in care.
(3)(a) The department shall make each quarterly report it receives  under this section available
to the public on the department’s website.
(b) Each program that submits a report under this section shall make its quarterly report
available to the public upon request at the program’s main office and on  the program’s website if
the program maintains a website.
(c) Each program shall provide notice regarding how to access the  quarterly reports to the
parents or guardians of children in care in the  program. The program shall provide the notice upon
the child in care’s admission and at least two times each year thereafter.
SECTION 9. Training. If a program places a child in care in a restraint or involuntary
seclusion, the individuals using the restraint or  involuntary seclusion must be trained, as
required by the Department of Human Services by  rule in effect on the effective date of this
2021 Act, to administer the type of restraint or involuntary seclusion used.
SECTION 10.  Section 9 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 9. [If a program places a child in care in a restraint or involuntary seclusion,  the individuals
using the restraint or involuntary seclusion must be trained, as required by the Department  of Human
Services by rule in effect on the effective date of this  2021 Act, to administer the type of restraint or
involuntary seclusion used. ]
(1)(a) The Department of Human Services shall adopt by  rule training standards and
certification requirements regarding  the placement of a child in care in a restraint or in-
voluntary seclusion, consistent with this section.
(b) The department shall designate two or three nationally recognized providers  of crisis
intervention training that meet the department’s  training standards and whose certifications
issued upon completion of the training programs the department will recognize  as satisfying
the department’s certification requirements.
(2) The department’s rules under this section must:
(a) Ensure consistency of training and professional development across all programs;
(b) Require the teaching of techniques for nonviolent crisis intervention that do not re-
quire restraint;
(c) Focus on de-escalation and trauma-informed  behavioral support as the core of a
training program;
(d) Offer options for certification in skills that do not include the use of  restraint to
improve agency-wide safety, culture and trauma-informed practices;
(e) Prioritize the reduction or elimination of the use of restraint and involuntary seclu-
sion;
(f) Ensure that any physical  intervention skills taught are trauma-informed, age-
appropriate and developmentally appropriate for children in care,  reduce the risk of physical
or emotional harm and are consistent with all state and federal laws;
(g) Include training to identify  the physical, psychological and emotional risks for chil-
dren and program staff related to the use of restraint and involuntary seclusion;
(h) Ensure fidelity of training through the publication  of consistent training materials
and resources for certified instructors and certified program staff;
(i) Include requirements for instructor training and certification; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 9
(j) Require regular,  ongoing support to certified instructors, including quality control,
monitoring of outcomes and  provision of information regarding networks for professional
collaboration and support.
(3) The department’s rules must require that training instructors:
(a) Be certified to conduct the type of training the instructor is providing;
(b) Complete a minimum of  26 hours of initial education with a focus on de-escalation,
nonviolent intervention and methods consistent with the department’s rules for the  use of
physical intervention;
(c) Complete a minimum of 12 hours of continuing education every two years;
(d) Be recertified at least once every two years; and
(e) Demonstrate written and physical competency  before receiving certification or re-
certification.
(4) The department’s rules must provide that an individual  who places a child in care in
a program in a  restraint must be certified in the use of the specific type of restraint used.
The department’s rules must describe the minimum certification requirements, including:
(a) Completion of a minimum of 12 hours of initial training in person  from an instructor
certified as provided in subsection (3) of this section, including at least six hours  of training
in positive behavior support, nonviolent crisis intervention and other methods  of nonphysical
intervention to support children in care in crisis;
(b) Annual continuing education with a certified instructor; and
(c) Demonstration of a mastery of the training program material both  in writing and by
physical competency before receiving certification.
(5) A certification issued under this section:
(a) Must be personal to the individual certified by the training provider;
(b) May be valid for no more than two years without recertification;
(c) Must require annual continuing education to maintain;
(d) Must require additional training to renew the certification;
(e) Must be portable between employers; and
(f) Must include:
(A) The dates during which the certification is current;
(B) The types of restraint in which the individual is certified, if any;
(C) The types of training the individual is certified to conduct, if any;
(D) Any special endorsements earned by the individual;
(E) The level of training; and
(F) The name of  the certified instructor who conducted the training and administered the
assessment of proficiency.
(6) An individual whose certification is consistent with the department’s rules under this
section shall maintain the documentation of the certification and make that  documentation
available to the department upon request.
SECTION 11.
Information provided to children in care.  (1) Each  child in care receiving
services from a child-caring agency must be provided with information that:
(a) Explains the provisions of sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act;
(b) Provides instruction regarding how a child in care may report suspected inappropriate
use of restraint or involuntary seclusion;
(c) Assures the child in care that the child  will not experience retaliation for reporting
suspected inappropriate uses of restraint or involuntary seclusion; and
(d) Includes the  telephone number for the toll-free child abuse hotline described in ORS
417.805 and the telephone numbers and electronic mail  addresses for the program’s licensing
or certification agency, the child in care’s caseworker and attorney, the child in care’s court
appointed special advocate and Disability Rights Oregon.
(2) The information described in subsection (1) of this section must be provided by:
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 10
(a) The Department  of Human Services if the department placed the child in care in the
child-caring agency;
(b) The Oregon Youth Authority if the child in care has been committed to the  custody
of the authority; or
(c) The child-caring agency, as required by  the department by rule, for all other children
in care.
SECTION 12.  ORS 418.257 is amended to read:
418.257. As used in ORS 418.257 to 418.259:
(1) “Abuse” means one or more of the following:
(a) Any physical injury to a child in care caused by other than accidental means, or that  ap-
pears to be at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(b) Neglect of a child in care.
(c) Abandonment, including desertion or willful forsaking of a  child in care or the withdrawal
or neglect of duties and obligations owed a child in care by a child-caring agency,  caretaker, certi-
fied foster home, developmental disabilities residential facility or other person.
(d) Willful infliction of physical pain or injury upon a child in care.
(e) An act that constitutes a crime under  ORS 163.375, 163.405, 163.411, 163.415, 163.425, 163.427,
163.465, 163.467 or 163.525.
(f) Verbal abuse.
(g) Financial exploitation.
(h) Sexual abuse.
[(i) Involuntary seclusion  of a child in care for the convenience of a child-caring agency, caretaker,
certified foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility  or to discipline the child in
care.]
[(j) A wrongful use of a physical or chemical restraint of a child in care, excluding an act of  re-
straint prescribed  by a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 and any treatment activities that are
consistent with an approved treatment plan or in connection with a court order. ]
(i) The use of restraint or  involuntary seclusion of a child in care in violation of section
2 or 3 of this 2021 Act.
(2) “Certified foster home” means a foster home certified  by the Department of Human Services
and subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645.
(3)(a) “Child in  care” means a person under 21 years of age who is residing in or receiving care
or services from:
(A) A child-caring agency or proctor foster home subject to  ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.470,
418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970;
(B) A certified foster home; or
(C) A developmental disabilities residential facility.
(b) “Child in care” does not include a person under 21 years  of age who is residing in any of
the entities listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection when  the care provided is in the home of the
child by the child’s parent.
[(4) “Child-caring agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.205. ]
[(5)] (4)  “Developmental disabilities residential facility” means a residential facility or  foster
home for children who  are [ 18] 17 years of age or younger and receiving developmental disability
services that is subject to ORS 443.400 to 443.455, 443.830 and 443.835.
[(6) “Involuntary seclusion” means  the confinement of a child in care alone in a room from which
the child in care is physically prevented from leaving. “Involuntary  seclusion” does not include age-
appropriate discipline, including but not limited to a time-out. ]
[(7) “Proctor foster home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.205. ]
[(8)(a)] (5)(a)  “Financial exploitation” means:
(A) Wrongfully taking the assets, funds or  property belonging to or intended for the use of a
child in care.
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 11
(B) Alarming  a child in care by conveying a threat to wrongfully take or appropriate moneys
or property of the child in care  if the child would reasonably believe that the threat conveyed would
be carried out.
(C) Misappropriating, misusing or transferring without authorization any moneys from any  ac-
count held jointly or singly by a child in care.
(D) Failing to use the  income or assets of a child in care effectively for the support and main-
tenance of the child in care.
(b) “Financial exploitation” does not include  age-appropriate discipline that may involve the
threat to withhold, or the withholding of, privileges.
[(9)] (6) “Intimidation” means compelling  or deterring conduct by threat. “Intimidation” does not
include age-appropriate discipline that may involve the threat to withhold privileges.
(7) “Involuntary seclusion” has the meaning given that term  in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
[(10)] (8) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) Any city or municipal police department.
(b) Any county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) Any district attorney.
(e) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
[(11)] (9) “Neglect” means:
(a) Failure  to provide the care, supervision or services necessary to maintain the physical and
mental health of a child in care; or
(b) The failure of a child-caring agency, proctor  foster home, certified foster home, develop-
mental disabilities residential facility, caretaker  or other person to make a reasonable effort to
protect a child in care from abuse.
(10) “Restraint” has the meaning given that term in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
[(12)] (11)  “Services” includes but is not limited to the provision  of food, clothing, medicine,
housing, medical services, assistance  with bathing or personal hygiene or any other service essential
to the well-being of a child in care.
[(13)] (12) “Sexual abuse” means:
(a) Sexual harassment, sexual exploitation or inappropriate exposure  to sexually explicit mate-
rial or language;
(b) Any sexual contact between a child in care and an  employee of a child-caring agency,
proctor foster home,  certified foster home, developmental disabilities residential facility, caretaker
or other person responsible for the provision of care or services to a child in care;
(c) Any sexual contact between a person and a child  in care that is unlawful under ORS chapter
163 and not subject to a defense under that chapter; or
(d) Any sexual contact that is achieved through force, trickery, threat or coercion.
[(14)] (13) “Sexual contact” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.305.
[(15)] (14)  “Sexual exploitation” means sexual exploitation as  described in ORS 419B.005
(1)(a)(E).
[(16)] (15) “Verbal abuse” means to threaten significant physical  or emotional harm to a child
in care through the use of:
(a) Derogatory or inappropriate names, insults, verbal assaults, profanity or ridicule; or
(b) Harassment, coercion, threats,  intimidation, humiliation, mental cruelty or inappropriate
sexual comments.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 418.259, as amended by section 9, chapter 19, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special
session), is amended to read:
418.259. (1) The investigation conducted by the Department of  Human Services under ORS
418.258 must result in one of the following findings:
(a) That the report is substantiated. A report is substantiated when there  is reasonable cause
to believe that the abuse of a child in care occurred.
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 12
(b) That the report is unsubstantiated. A report is unsubstantiated when there is no  evidence
that the abuse of a child in care occurred.
(c) That the  report is inconclusive. A report is inconclusive when there is some indication that
the abuse occurred but there  is insufficient evidence to conclude that there is reasonable cause to
believe that the abuse occurred.
(2) When a report is received under ORS 418.258 alleging that a child  in care may have been
subjected to abuse, the department shall notify the case managers for the child, the attorney for the
child, the child’s court appointed special advocate, the parents or guardians of the child, any attor-
ney representing a parent or guardian of the  child and any governmental agency that has a contract
with the child-caring  agency or developmental disabilities residential facility to provide care or
services to the child that a report has been received.
(3)(a) The department may interview the child in care who  is the subject of suspected abuse and
any witnesses , including  other children,  without the presence of employees of the child-caring
agency, proctor foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility, the provider of services
at a certified foster home or  department personnel. The department shall inform the child in care
that the child may have the child’s parent or guardian, if the child has not been committed to  the
custody of the department or the Oregon Youth Authority, or attorney  present when participating
in an interview conducted in the course of an abuse investigation.
(b) When investigating an allegation of inappropriate use of restraint or  involuntary se-
clusion, the department shall:
(A) Conduct the interviews described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(B) Review all relevant incident reports related to the child  in care and other reports
related to the restraint or involuntary seclusion of the child in care;
(C) Review any audio, video or photographic recordings of  the restraint or involuntary
seclusion, including the circumstances immediately before and following the incident;
(D) During an interview with the child  in care who is the subject of the suspected abuse,
ask the child about whether they experienced any reportable injury or pain as a result  of the
restraint or involuntary seclusion;
(E) Review the training records related to all of  the individuals who were involved in the
use of restraint or involuntary seclusion; and
(F) Make all reasonable efforts to conduct trauma-informed interviews  of each child
witness, including the child in care who is  the subject of suspected abuse unless the inves-
tigator makes a specific determination that the interview may significantly traumatize  the
child and is not in the best interests of the child.
(4) The department shall notify the following when a report of abuse is substantiated:
(a) The Director of Human Services.
(b) Personnel in the department responsible for the licensing, certificate  or authorization of
child-caring agencies.
(c) The department’s lead personnel in that part of the department  that is responsible for child
welfare  generally.
(d) With respect to the child in care  who is the subject of the abuse report and investigation,
the case managers for the child, the attorney for  the child, the child’s court appointed special ad-
vocate, the parents or guardians of  the child, any attorney representing a parent or guardian of the
child and any governmental agency that has a contract with the child-caring agency  to provide care
or services to the child.
(e) The parents or guardians of the child in care who is the subject of the abuse report and in-
vestigation if the child in care has  not been committed to the custody of the department or the
youth authority. Notification under this  paragraph may not include any details or information other
than that a report of abuse has been substantiated.
(f) Any governmental agency that has a contract  with the child-caring agency to provide care
or services to a child in care.
(g) The local citizen review board established by the Judicial Department under ORS 419A.090.
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 13
(5) The department shall report on a quarterly basis to  the interim legislative committees on
child welfare for  the purposes of public review and oversight of the quality and safety of child-caring
agencies, certified foster homes and developmental  disabilities residential facilities that are licensed,
certified or authorized by the department in this state and of proctor foster homes that are  certified
by the child-caring agencies. Information provided in reports under this subsection may  not contain
the name or any identifying information of a child in care but must contain all of the following:
(a) The name of any child-caring agency, including  an out-of-state child-caring agency, proctor
foster home or developmental disabilities  residential facility, or, provided there are five or more
certified foster homes in  the county, the name of the county where a certified foster home is located,
where the department conducted an investigation pursuant to ORS 418.258 that resulted  in a finding
that the report of abuse was substantiated during that quarter;
(b) The approximate date that the abuse occurred;
(c) The nature of the abuse and a brief narrative description of the abuse that occurred;
(d) Whether physical injury, sexual abuse or death resulted from the abuse;
(e) Corrective actions taken or ordered by the department  and the outcome of the corrective
actions; and
(f) Information the department received in that  quarter regarding any substantiated allegations
of child abuse made by any other state involving a congregate  care residential setting, as defined
in ORS 419B.354, in which the department has placed Oregon children.
(6) The department’s quarterly  report under subsection (5) of this section must also
contain all of the following:
(a) The total number of restraints used in programs that quarter;
(b) The  total number of programs that reported the use of restraints of children in care
that quarter;
(c) The total number of individual children in care who  were placed in restraints by
programs that quarter;
(d) The number of reportable  injuries to children in care that resulted from those re-
straints;
(e) The number of incidents in which an individual  who was not appropriately trained in
the use of the restraint used on a child in care in a program; and
(f) The number of incidents that were reported for potential inappropriate use  of re-
straint.
[(6)] (7) In compiling records, reports and other information during an  investigation under ORS
418.258 (1) and in issuing findings, letters of concern or reprimands, the Director of Human  Services
or the director’s designee and the department  may not refer to the employee, person or entity that
is the subject of  the investigation as an “alleged perpetrator” but must refer to the employee, person
or entity as the “respondent.”
(8) As used in this section, “program,” “reportable injury”  and “restraint” have the
meanings given those terms in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECURE TRANSPORTATION SERVICES PROVIDERS
SECTION 14.
Referrals to secure transportation services providers.  (1) A person or or-
ganization that makes a referral  or recommendation related to the use of a secure trans-
portation services provider to  transport a child to a school, agency, organization or program
described in ORS 418.205 (2)(a)(A) must provide the written referral  disclosure described in
subsection (2) of this section if the child to be transferred is a resident of this state or if the
school, agency, organization or program to which the secure transportation services provider
will deliver the child is located in this state.
(2) The referral disclosure under this section must state:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 14
ORS 418.215 requires a secure transportation  services provider that transports children
to or  from a school, agency, organization or program along a route that begins or ends in
Oregon to be licensed by the Department of Human Services.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(3) As used in this section, “child” and “secure transportation services provider” have
the meanings given those terms in ORS 418.205.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 418.205, as amended by sections  15a and 15b, chapter 19, Oregon Laws 2020
(first special session), is amended to read:
418.205. As used in ORS  418.205 to 418.327, 418.470, 418.475, 418.950 to 418.970 and 418.992 to
418.998, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Child” means an unmarried person under 21 years of  age who resides in or receives care
or services from a child-caring agency.
(2)(a) “Child-caring agency”:
(A) Means any  private school, private agency, private organization or county program providing:
(i) Day treatment for children with emotional disturbances;
(ii) Adoption placement services;
(iii) Residential care, including but not limited to  foster care or residential treatment for chil-
dren;
(iv) Residential care in combination  with academic education and therapeutic care, including
but not limited to treatment for emotional, behavioral or mental health disturbances;
(v) Outdoor youth programs; or
(vi) Other similar care or services for children.
(B) Includes the following:
(i) A shelter-care home that is not a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
(ii) An independent residence facility as described in ORS 418.475;
(iii) A private residential boarding school; [ and]
(iv) A child-caring facility as defined in ORS 418.950[ .]; and
(v) A secure transportation services provider that transports  or provides escort services
for children on the highways of this state along  a route that begins or ends in this state to
or from a school, agency, organization or program described in  subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph, if the school, agency, organization or program  is located in this state or in any
other state.
(b) “Child-caring agency” does not include:
(A) Residential facilities or  foster care homes certified or licensed by the Department of Human
Services under ORS 443.400 to 443.455, 443.830 and 443.835 for children receiving developmental
disability services;
(B) Any private agency or organization facilitating the provision of respite services  for parents
pursuant to a  properly executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056. For purposes of this sub-
paragraph, “respite services” means the voluntary assumption of short-term care and control  of a
minor child without compensation or reimbursement of expenses for the purpose of providing a
parent in crisis with relief from the demands of ongoing care of the parent’s child;
(C) A youth job development organization as defined in ORS 344.415;
(D) A shelter-care home that is a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
(E) A foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
(F) A facility that exclusively serves individuals 18 years of age and older; or
(G) A facility that primarily serves both adults and children but requires that any child must
be accompanied at all times by at least one custodial parent or guardian.
(3) “Child-caring facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.950.
(4)(a) “County program” means any county operated program that provides care or services  to
children :
(A) In the custody of the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Youth Authority[ .]; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 15
(B) Under a contract with the Oregon Health Authority.
(b) “County program” does  not include any local juvenile detention facility that receives state
services provided and coordinated by the Department of Corrections under ORS 169.070.
(5) “Governmental agency” means an  executive, legislative or judicial agency, department,
board, commission, authority, institution or instrumentality of this state or of a  county, municipality
or other political subdivision of this state.
(6) “Independent residence facility” means a facility established or certified under  ORS 418.475.
(7)(a) “Outdoor youth program”  means a program that provides, in an outdoor living setting,
services to children who have behavioral problems, mental health problems or problems with  abuse
of alcohol or drugs.
(b) “Outdoor youth program” does not include any program, facility or activity:
(A) Operated by a governmental entity;
(B) Operated or affiliated with the Oregon Youth Corps;
(C) Licensed by the Department of Human Services under  other authority of the department; or
(D) Operated by a youth job development organization as defined in ORS 344.415.
(8) “Private” means not owned, operated or administered by any governmental agency or unit.
(9) “Private residential boarding school” means either of the following as the context requires:
(a) A child-caring agency that is a  private school that provides residential care in combination
with academic education and therapeutic care,  including but not limited to treatment for emotional,
behavioral or mental health disturbances; or
(b) A private school  providing residential care that is primarily engaged in educational work
under ORS 418.327.
(10) “Proctor foster home” means a foster home certified by a child-caring agency under  ORS
418.248 that is not subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645.
(11) “Provider of care or services for children”  means a person, entity or organization that
provides care or services to children, regardless of whether the child is  in the custody of the De-
partment of Human Services,  and that does not otherwise meet the definition of, or requirements for,
a child-caring agency. “Provider of care or services for children” includes a proctor foster home
certified by a child-caring agency under ORS 418.248.
(12) “Qualified  residential treatment program” means a program described in section 12b, chap-
ter 19, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session).
(13) “Secure  transportation services provider” means a private organization or person
that provides secure transportation or secure escort  services for children to or from a
school, agency, organization or program described in subsection (2)(a)(A) of this section, if
the school, agency, organization or program is located in this state or in any other state.
[(13)] (14) “Shelter-care home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.470.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 16.
Reports first due.  The reports under section 7 of this 2021 Act are  due on
February 1, 2022, and quarterly thereafter. The reports due on February 1, 2022, must include
data regarding the program’s use of restraint  and involuntary seclusion from September 1,
2021, through December 31, 2021.
SECTION 17. Appropriations. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,
the limitation on expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5529), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts and Medicare receipts and including  federal funds for indirect cost recovery, Social
Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries and  the Child Care and Development
Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter __,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5529), collected or received by the Department of
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 16
Human Services,  for shared services, is increased by $591,746 for the purpose of carrying out
the provisions of this 2021 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 3 (2), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5529), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal
funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5529), collected or received by the Department of Human  Services, for state as-
sessments and enterprise-wide costs,  is increased by $231,981 for the purpose of carrying out
the provisions of this 2021 Act.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 2 (2), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5529), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare  receipts and in-
cluding federal funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security Supplemental Security  In-
come recoveries and the Child Care and Development  Fund, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5529), collected or received by the Department of Human Services, for state  assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased  by $1,483 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions
of this 2021 Act.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Human  Services by section 1 (2), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5529),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $440,116, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions
of this 2021 Act.
(5) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 3 (7), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5529), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal
funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5529), collected or received by the Department of Human Services,  for
intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased by $2,042,807  for the purpose
of carrying out the provisions of this 2021 Act.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Human  Services by section 1 (7), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5529), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for  intellectual/developmental dis-
abilities programs, is increased by $1,047,717, for the purpose of carrying out the  provisions
of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 18.
Operative dates. (1)(a) The amendments to sections  3, 5, 7 and 9 of this 2021
Act by sections 4, 6, 8 and 10 of this 2021 Act become operative on July 1, 2022.
(b) The Department of Human Services may adopt rules and  take any other action before
the operative date specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection that is  necessary to enable
the department, on or after the operative date specified  in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
to undertake and exercise all of the duties, functions and powers conferred  on the depart-
ment by the amendments to sections 3, 5, 7  and 9 of this 2021 Act by sections 4, 6, 8 and 10
of this 2021 Act.
(2)(a) Section 14 of this 2021 Act and the  amendments to ORS 418.205 by section 15 of this
2021 Act become operative on January 2, 2022.
(b) The department may adopt rules and take any other action before the  operative date
specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection that is necessary to enable the department, on
or after the operative date specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection, to undertake  and
exercise all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by  section 14
of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 418.205 by section 15 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 17
SECTION 19. Captions. The unit and section captions used in this  2021 Act are provided
only for the convenience of the reader and do not become part of  the statutory law of this
state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 20. Effective date.  This  2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preserva-
tion of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2021
Act takes effect on September 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 710 (SB 710-B) Page 18